cs: Odrůda slunečnice: Autumn Beauty; Chocolate; Italian White; Jade; Lemon Queen; Moulin Rouge; ProCut (série); Ring of Fire; Skyscraper; Soraya; Strawberry Blonde; Sunrich (série); Teddy Bear; Velvet Queen; Vincent's Choice; Jiné
th: ทานตะวันหลากหลายสายพันธุ์: Autumn Beauty; Chocolate; Italian White; Jade; Lemon Queen; Moulin Rouge; ProCut (ซีรีส์); Ring of Fire; Skyscraper; Soraya; Strawberry Blonde; Sunrich (ซีรีส์); Teddy Bear; Velvet Queen; Vincent's Choice; อื่นๆ
fi: Auringonkukkalajike: Autumn Beauty; Chocolate; Italian White; Jade; Lemon Queen; Moulin Rouge; ProCut (tuotesarja); Ring of Fire; Skyscraper; Soraya; Strawberry Blonde; Sunrich (tuotesarja); Teddy Bear; Velvet Queen; Vincent's Choice; Muu
nl: Zonnebloem soort: Autumn Beauty; Chocolate; Italian White; Jade; Lemon Queen; Moulin Rouge; ProCut (serie); Ring of Fire; Skyscraper; Soraya; Strawberry Blonde; Sunrich (serie); Teddy Bear; Velvet Queen; Vincent's Choice; Overig
pt-BR: Girassol variedade: Autumn Beauty; Chocolate; Italian White; Jade; Lemon Queen; Moulin Rouge; ProCut (série); Ring of Fire; Skyscraper; Soraya; Strawberry Blonde; Sunrich (série); Teddy Bear; Velvet Queen; Vincent's Choice; Outros
zh-TW: 向日葵品種: 秋日之美; 巧克力; 義大利白; 翡翠; 檸檬女王; 紅磨坊; ProCut (系列); 火之環; 摩天大樓; 索拉雅; 草莓金髮; Sunrich (系列); 泰迪熊; 天鵝絨女王; 梵谷之選; 其他
ro-RO: Soi de floarea-soarelui: Autumn Beauty; Chocolate; Italian White; Jade; Lemon Queen; Moulin Rouge; ProCut (serie); Ring of Fire; Skyscraper; Soraya; Strawberry Blonde; Sunrich (serie); Teddy Bear; Velvet Queen; Vincent's Choice; Altele
pt-PT: Variedade de girassol: Autumn Beauty; Chocolate; Italian White; Jade; Lemon Queen; Moulin Rouge; ProCut (série); Ring of Fire; Skyscraper; Soraya; Strawberry Blonde; Sunrich (série); Teddy Bear; Velvet Queen; Vincent's Choice; Outro
pl: Odmiana słonecznika: Autumn Beauty; Chocolate; Italian White; Jade; Lemon Queen; Moulin Rouge; ProCut (seria); Ring of Fire; Skyscraper; Soraya; Strawberry Blonde; Sunrich (seria); Teddy Bear; Velvet Queen; Vincent's Choice; Inne
de: Sonnenblumenart: Autumn Beauty; Chocolate; Italian White; Jade; Lemon Queen; Moulin Rouge; ProCut (Serie); Ring of Fire; Skyscraper; Soraya; Strawberry Blonde; Sunrich (Serie); Teddy Bear; Velvet Queen; Vincent's Choice; Sonstige
lt-LT: Saulėgrąžų veislė: „Autumn Beauty“; „Chocolate“; „Italian White“; „Jade“; „Lemon Queen“; „Moulin Rouge“; „ProCut“ (serija); „Ring of Fire“; „Skyscraper“; „Soraya“; „Strawberry Blonde“; „Sunrich“ (serija); „Teddy Bear“; „Velvet Queen“; „Vincent's Choice“; Kita
el: Ποικιλία ηλίανθου: Autumn Beauty; Chocolate; Italian White; Jade; Lemon Queen; Moulin Rouge; ProCut (σειρά); Ring of Fire; Skyscraper; Soraya; Strawberry Blonde; Sunrich (σειρά); Teddy Bear; Velvet Queen; Vincent's Choice; Άλλο
sk-SK: Odroda Slnečnice: Autumn Beauty; Chocolate; Italian White; Jade; Lemon Queen; Moulin Rouge; ProCut (séria); Ring of Fire; Skyscraper; Soraya; Strawberry Blonde; Sunrich (séria); Teddy Bear; Velvet Queen; Vincent's Choice; Iné
sv: Solrossort: Autumn Beauty; Chocolate; Italian White; Jade; Lemon Queen; Moulin Rouge; ProCut (serie); Ring of Fire; Skyscraper; Soraya; Strawberry Blonde; Sunrich (serie); Teddy Bear; Velvet Queen; Vincent's Choice; Övrigt
vi: Giống hoa hướng dương: Autumn Beauty; Chocolate; Italian White; Jade; Lemon Queen; Moulin Rouge; ProCut (dòng); Ring of Fire; Skyscraper; Soraya; Strawberry Blonde; Sunrich (dòng); Teddy Bear; Velvet Queen; Vincent's Choice; Khác
es: Variedad de girasol: Autumn Beauty; Chocolate; Italian White; Jade; Lemon Queen; Moulin Rouge; ProCut (serie); Ring of Fire; Skyscraper; Soraya; Strawberry Blonde; Sunrich (serie); Teddy Bear; Velvet Queen; Vincent's Choice; Otro
en: Sunflower variety: Autumn Beauty; Chocolate; Italian White; Jade; Lemon Queen; Moulin Rouge; ProCut (series); Ring of Fire; Skyscraper; Soraya; Strawberry Blonde; Sunrich (series); Teddy Bear; Velvet Queen; Vincent's Choice; Other
it: Varietà di girasole: Autumn Beauty; Chocolate; Italian White; Jade; Lemon Queen; Moulin Rouge; ProCut (serie); Ring of Fire; Skyscraper; Soraya; Strawberry Blonde; Sunrich (serie); Teddy Bear; Velvet Queen; Vincent's Choice; Altro
bg-BG: Сорт слънчоглед: Есенна красота; Шоколад; Италианско бяло; Джейд; Лимонова кралица; Мулен Руж; ProCut (серия); Огнен пръстен; Небостъргач; Сорая; Ягодово русо; Sunrich (серия); Плюшено мече; Кадифена кралица; Изборът на Винсент; Друго
ko: 해바라기 품종: 어텀 뷰티; 초콜릿; 이탈리안 화이트; 제이드; 레몬 퀸; 물랑 루즈; 프로컷(시리즈); 링 오브 파이어; 스카이스크래퍼; 소라야; 스트로베리 블론드; 선리치(시리즈); 테디베어; 벨벳 퀸; 빈센츠 초이스; 기타
da: Solsikkevariant: Autumn Beauty; Chocolate; Italian White; Jade; Lemon Queen; Moulin Rouge; ProCut (serie); Ring of Fire; Skyscraper; Soraya; Strawberry Blonde; Sunrich (serie); Teddy Bear; Velvet Queen; Vincent's Choice; Andet
fr: Variété de tournesol: Autumn Beauty; Chocolate; Italian White; Jade; Lemon Queen; Moulin Rouge; ProCut (série); Ring of Fire; Skyscraper; Soraya; Strawberry Blonde; Sunrich (série); Teddy Bear; Velvet Queen; Vincent’s Choice; Autre
zh-CN: 向日葵品种: 秋色之美; 巧克力; 意大利白; 玉石; 柠檬女王; 红磨坊; ProCut（系列）; 火环; 摩天大楼; 索拉雅; 草莓金; Sunrich（系列）; 泰迪熊; 天鹅绒女王; 文森特的选择; 其他
ja: ヒマワリの種類: オータムビューティー; チョコレート; イタリアンホワイト; ジェイド; レモンクイーン; ムーランルージュ; プロカット (シリーズ); リングオブファイア; スカイスクレイパー; ソラヤ; ストロベリーブロンド; サンリッチ (シリーズ); テディベア; ベルベットクイーン; ビンセントチョイス; その他
nb: Solsikkevariant: Autumn Beauty; Chocolate; Italian White; Jade; Lemon Queen; Moulin Rouge; ProCut (serie); Ring of Fire; Skyscraper; Soraya; Strawberry Blonde; Sunrich (serie); Teddy Bear; Velvet Queen; Vincent's Choice; Annet
hr-HR: Sorta suncokreta: Autumn Beauty; Chocolate; Italian White; Jade; Lemon Queen; Moulin Rouge; ProCut (serija); Ring of Fire; Skyscraper; Soraya; Strawberry Blonde; Sunrich (serija); Teddy Bear; Velvet Queen; Vincent's Choice; Ostalo
ru: Сорт подсолнечника: Осенняя красавица; Шоколад; Итальянский белый; Нефрит; Лимонная королева; Мулен Руж; ProCut (серия); Кольцо огня; Небоскреб; Сорайя; Клубничный блонд; Sunrich (серия); Плюшевый мишка; Бархатная королева; Выбор Винсента; Другой
hu: Napraforgó fajtája: Autumn Beauty; Chocolate; Italian White; Jade; Lemon Queen; Moulin Rouge; ProCut (sorozat); Ring of Fire; Skyscraper; Soraya; Strawberry Blonde; Sunrich (sorozat); Teddy Bear; Velvet Queen; Vincent's Choice; Egyéb
sl-SI: Sorta sončnic: Autumn Beauty; Chocolate; Italian White; Jade; Lemon Queen; Moulin Rouge; Serija ProCut; Ring of Fire; Skyscraper; Soraya; Strawberry Blonde; Serija Sunrich; Teddy Bear; Velvet Queen; Vincent's Choice; Drugo
tr: Ayçiçeği kültivarı: Autumn Beauty; Chocolate; Italian White; Jade; Lemon Queen; Moulin Rouge; ProCut (seri); Ring of Fire; Skyscraper; Soraya; Strawberry Blonde; Sunrich (seri); Teddy Bear; Velvet Queen; Vincent's Choice; Diğer